Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 19

Auctioneers

62-19-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Affiliate auctioneer” means an individual who, for compensation or valuable consideration, or otherwise, is employed, directly or indirectly, by a principal auctioneer to deal or engage in any activity described in subdivision (9);

“Auction” means a sales transaction conducted by oral, written, or electronic exchange between an auctioneer and members of the audience, consisting of a series of invitations by the auctioneer for offers to members of the audience to purchase goods or real estate, culminating in the acceptance by the auctioneer of the highest or most favorable offer made by a member of the participating audience;

“Auctioneer” means a principal auctioneer, bid caller auctioneer, or public automobile auctioneer;

“Bid caller auctioneer” means an individual who, for compensation or valuable consideration, or otherwise, is hired by a principal auctioneer, public automobile auction, or public automobile auctioneer to solicit bids for the purchase of goods at an auction;

“Commission” means the Tennessee auctioneer commission;

“Continuing education” means six (6) hours each renewal period;

“Goods” means chattels, merchandise, real or personal property, or commodities of any form or type that may lawfully be kept or offered for sale;

“Person” includes an individual, association, partnership, corporation, and the officers, directors, and employees of a corporation;

“Principal auctioneer” means an individual who, for a fee, commission, or any other valuable consideration, or with the intention or expectation of receiving a fee, commission, or any other valuable consideration by the means or process of auction or sale at auction, offers and executes a listing contract, sale, purchase, or exchange of goods, and is responsible for the management and supervision of an auction company, including its wholly owned subsidiary or affiliate company;

“Public automobile auction” means offering motor vehicles for sale to the highest bidder, where buyers are members of the public, by a motor vehicle dealer licensed to sell used motor vehicles and licensed as a public automobile auctioneer by the commission. However, no public automobile auction may otherwise limit the auctioning of used motor vehicles exclusively to licensed motor vehicle dealers or their duly authorized agents;

“Public automobile auctioneer” means an individual who, for a fee, commission, or any other valuable consideration, or with the intention or expectation of receiving a fee, commission, or any other valuable consideration at an auction or sale at auction, offers, negotiates, or attempts to negotiate a listing contract, sale, purchase, or exchange of goods, including motor vehicles; and

“Timed listing” means offering goods for sale with a fixed ending time and date that does not extend based on bidding activity.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 1; 1976, ch. 824, § 1; 1978, ch. 569, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1901; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 1; 1997, ch. 91, § 7; 2008, ch. 724, § 1; 2015, ch. 291, § 8; 2019, ch. 471, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 724, § 8 provided that the Tennessee auctioneer commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added the definitions of “public automobile auction” and “public automobile auctioneer.” All the rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read: “As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:“(1) ‘Apprentice auctioneer’ means any individual who, for compensation or valuable consideration, or otherwise, is employed, directly or indirectly, by an auctioneer to deal or engage in any activity defined in subdivision (3);“(2) ‘Auction’ means a sales transaction conducted by means of oral or written exchange between an auctioneer and members of the audience, which exchange consists of a series of invitations for offers for purchase of goods or real estate made by the auctioneer and offers to purchase made by members of the audience culminating in the acceptance by the auctioneer of the highest or most favorable offer made by a member of the participating audience;“(3) ‘Auctioneer’ means any individual who, for a fee, commission or any other valuable consideration, or with the intention or expectation of receiving a fee, commission or any other valuable consideration, by the means or process of auction or sale at auction, offers, negotiates or attempts to negotiate a listing contract, sale, purchase or exchange of goods;“(4) ‘Commission’ means the Tennessee auctioneer commission;“(5) ‘Continuing education’ means six (6) hours each renewal period;“(6) ‘Firm’ means any person who, as part of the person's business, arranges, manages, sponsors, advertises or carries out auctions;“(7) ‘Goods’ means any chattels, merchandise, real or personal property or commodities of any form or type that may lawfully be kept or offered for sale;“(8) ‘Person’ includes an individual, association, partnership, corporation and the officers, directors and employees of a corporation;“(9) ‘Principal auctioneer’ means the auctioneer who is responsible for the management and supervision of a firm;“(10) ‘Public automobile auction’ means offering motor vehicles for sale to the highest bidder where buyers are members of the public by any motor vehicle dealer licensed to sell used motor vehicles and which dealer is licensed as a public automobile auctioneer by the Tennessee auctioneer commission; provided, that no public automobile auction shall otherwise limit the auctioning of used motor vehicles exclusively to licensed motor vehicle dealers or their duly authorized agents; and“(11) ‘Public automobile auctioneer’ means any individual who, for a fee, commission or any other valuable consideration, or with the intention or expectation of receiving a fee, commission or any other valuable consideration, by the means or process of auction or sale at auction, offers, negotiates or attempts to negotiate a listing contract, sale, purchase or exchange of goods, including motor vehicles.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Motor vehicle auctions, § 55-17-120.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Auctions and Auctioneers, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Internet drop-off stores, which assist individuals in selling items through Internet sites such as eBay, do not fit the statutory definition of “auction” or “auctioneer,” OAG 06-053, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 54 (3/27/06).

62-19-102. License requirement.

It is unlawful for a person to:

Act as, advertise as, or represent to be an auctioneer without holding a valid license issued by the commission;

Conduct or offer to conduct an auction of real property unless the person is duly licensed as an auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer and as a broker or affiliate broker under chapter 13 of this title. However, with respect to the authority of an affiliate auctioneer to conduct or offer to conduct an auction of real property, the auctioneer for whom the affiliate auctioneer is employed for such purposes must be on the premises of the property during the auction. This subdivision (a)(2) does not require ringpersons or other persons not vocally conducting an auction to be duly licensed as auctioneers, nor duly licensed under chapter 13 of this title, unless the ringpersons or other persons act as an affiliate broker or broker within the meaning of chapter 13 of this title; or

Act as, advertise as, or represent to be a public automobile auctioneer unless the person is duly licensed as a public automobile auctioneer and as a motor vehicle dealer under title 55, chapter 17, part 1.

All auctions arranged by or through a principal auctioneer must be conducted exclusively by individuals licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-1902; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 2; 1985, ch. 357, § 1; 2003, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 724, § 2; 2019, ch. 471, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 724, § 8 provided that the Tennessee auctioneer commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added subdivision (a)(3). All the rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “a person” for “any person” in the introductory language of (a); rewrote (a)(1) and (a)(2) which read: “(1) Act as or advertise or represent to be an auctioneer, apprentice auctioneer or firm without holding a valid license issued by the commission under this chapter or prior state law;“(2) Conduct or offer to conduct an auction of real property unless the person is duly licensed as an auctioneer or apprentice auctioneer and as a broker or affiliate broker under the provisions of the Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973, compiled in chapter 13 of this title; provided, however, with respect to the authority of an apprentice auctioneer to conduct or offer to conduct an auction of real property, that the auctioneer for whom the apprentice auctioneer is employed for such purposes must be on the premises of the property during the auction. This subdivision (a)(2) shall not be construed to require ringpersons or other persons not vocally conducting an auction to be duly licensed as auctioneers, nor to be duly licensed under chapter 13 of this title, unless the ringpersons or other persons act as an affiliate broker or broker within the meaning of chapter 13 of this title; or”; substituted “Act as, advertise as, or represent” for “Act as or advertise or represent” at the beginning of (a)(3); and substituted “or through a principal auctioneer must be conducted exclusively by individuals licensed” for “or through a firm shall be conducted exclusively by individuals who are licensed as auctioneers” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Real estate broker and affiliate broker defined, § 62-13-102.

62-19-103. Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

A person acting as a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, administrator, executor, or other person acting under order of a court;

A trustee acting under a trust agreement, deed of trust or will, or a secured party selling collateral after default by a debtor in accordance with title 47, chapter 9;

An auction conducted by or under the direction of a governmental entity or pursuant to a judicial order or decree;

An auction conducted by or on behalf of a political party, church, or charitable corporation or association, if the individual conducting the sale receives no compensation and does not, by advertising or otherwise, hold their self out as available to engage in the sale of goods at auction;

A person performing acts in the regular course of or as an incident to the management of and investment in property owned or leased by the person, if the property was not acquired for the purpose of resale. When a sales tax, as prescribed in title 67, is not levied upon the sale of personal property, there is a presumption that the personal property was purchased for the purpose of resale;

An auction conducted for the sale of livestock sponsored through or in cooperation with the state department of agriculture or the University of Tennessee extension, or both;

An auction sale of tobacco at or for a warehouse operated pursuant to title 43, chapter 19;

A livestock auction sale regulated by the United States department of agriculture packers and stockyards administration, if the sale uses:

The shipper's proceeds account required by federal regulations; and

An auctioneer licensed under this chapter;

Any fixed price or timed listings that allow bidding on an internet website, but do not constitute a simulcast of a live auction;

An exclusive online auction whose primary business activity is selling nonrepairable or salvage vehicles in this state and holds the appropriate license issued by the Tennessee motor vehicle commission;

An in-person or simulcast auction whose primary business activity is selling nonrepairable or salvage vehicles in this state, and holds the appropriate license issued by the Tennessee motor vehicle commission and that uses a licensed auctioneer; and

An individual who generates less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in revenue a calendar year from the sale of property in online auctions.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 3; 1969, ch. 247, § 1; 1976, ch. 824, § 2; 1978, ch. 569, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-1903; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 3; 1984, ch. 1000, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 915, § 1; 1991, ch. 485, § 4; 2006, ch. 533, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, § 6.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “A” for “Any” at the beginning of (1), (2), (5) and (8); substituted “An” for “Any” at the beginning of (3), (4) and (6); substituted “prescribed in title 67,” for “provided by title 67, chapter 1,” in (5); substituted “An auction sale of tobacco” for “Any auctioneer conducting a sale of tobacco” at the beginning of (7); rewrote (8)(B) which read: “(B) A Tennessee licensed auctioneer; or”; deleted “that” preceding “do not” in (9); and added (10)-(12).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-104. Auctioneer commission.

There is created in the division of regulatory boards the Tennessee auctioneer commission for issuing licenses to auctioneers and affiliate auctioneers engaged in the auction business.

The commission shall be composed of five (5) members. The term of each member shall be three (3) years. The additional member appointed pursuant to Acts 1989, ch. 331 shall be appointed to serve a regular three-year term and shall meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(2).

Four (4) members of the commission shall be auctioneers. Each member shall have been actively and principally engaged as a licensed auctioneer for a period of no less than five (5) years next preceding the appointment, shall be of recognized standing in the member's branch of the auction business and shall be at least thirty (30) years of age and of good moral character.

One (1) member of the commission shall not be engaged in the auction business. The member shall be at least thirty (30) years of age and of good moral character and shall be appointed from the state at large.

The new auctioneer member authorized by Acts 1989, ch. 331, shall be appointed from the state at large.

The governor, in making appointments of the auctioneer members to the commission, shall ensure that each grand division of the state is represented.

All members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

Each member shall hold over after the expiration of the member's term until a successor shall have been duly appointed and qualified.

The governor may remove any member of the commission for misconduct, incompetency or willful neglect of duty.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 29, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-1904; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 34; 1989, ch. 331, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee auctioneer commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “affiliate auctioneers” for “apprentice auctioneers” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

62-19-105. Certificates of appointment — Legal assistance — Prosecution of complaints.

Each member of the commission shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor before entering upon the discharge of the duties of office.

The commission or any committee of the commission shall be entitled to the services of the attorney general and reporter in connection with the affairs of the commission.

The commission may prefer a complaint for violation of this chapter before any court of competent jurisdiction, and it may take the necessary legal steps through the proper legal officers of the state to enforce this chapter and collect the penalties provided in this chapter.

Complaints shall be prosecuted in the name of the Tennessee auctioneer commission.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 5; 1979, ch. 422, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-1905.

62-19-106. Organization of commission — Rules — Seal — Records.

Immediately upon their qualification, the commission shall meet and organize by selecting from among its members a chair and other officers considered necessary and may do all things necessary and convenient for carrying into effect this chapter.

The commission has the power to make bylaws, rules and regulations that it considers necessary that are not inconsistent with this chapter or other general laws of the state.

The commission shall adopt a seal for its use, which shall bear the words “Tennessee Auctioneer Commission,” and the administrative director of the commission shall have care and custody of the seal.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the commission shall be received in evidence in all courts and with like effect as the originals.

The commission has the authority to establish continuing education requirements and standards for individual licensees. This subsection (e) shall apply only to those licensees who received their licenses after January 1, 1985.

An auctioneer shall be exempt from continuing education requirements if:

The auctioneer has reached sixty (60) years of age and has been licensed as an auctioneer for ten (10) years or longer;

The auctioneer has been licensed pursuant to this chapter since July 1, 1999; or

The auctioneer holds only a bid caller license.

No affiliate auctioneer is exempt from continuing education requirements.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-1906; Acts 1997, ch. 91, § 3; 1999, ch. 358, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 726, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, §§ 8, 9.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (e)(2)(C); and substituted “No affiliate auctioneer is exempt” for “No apprentice shall be exempt” in (e)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-107. Meetings of commission.

The commission shall meet at least one (1) time each quarter of every calendar year for the purpose of transacting business that may properly come before it.

Special meetings of the commission shall be held at times that the commission may provide in the bylaws it may adopt.

Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum at a commission meeting.

Due notice of each meeting and the time and place of the meeting shall be given each member in the manner that the bylaws may provide.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-1907; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 5; 1997, ch. 91, § 4.

Cross-References. Notice to director of division of regulatory boards as ex officio member of commission, § 56-1-304.

62-19-108. Liens for unpaid commissions and fees.

Notwithstanding § 62-19-119, any auctioneer who performs auctioneering services and is subsequently denied payment for a commission or fee for services performed shall have a lien for the work upon the property that the auctioneer was hired to auction; provided, however, that the lien shall only extend to property that is owned by the person who has denied payment for a commission or fee for services performed by the auctioneer.

Notice of the lien shall be filed within sixty (60) days after the date of the auction with the register's office in the county or counties in which the property is located. The lien shall not be effective against a bona fide purchaser for value.

The lien shall continue for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of filing in the register's office in the county or counties in which the property is located and until the final termination of any suit for enforcement brought within that period.

Acts 2007, ch. 192, § 1; 2008, ch. 615, § 1.

62-19-109. Administrative director.

The director of the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance or the director's designee shall serve as administrative director for the commission and shall provide all administrative functions for the commission.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 13; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(29); 1976, ch. 824, § 4; 1978, ch. 569, § 3; 1978, ch. 906, § 29; T.C.A., § 62-1909; Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the amendment to this section by the act, and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that the amendment to this section by the act will not apply to any court sale.

Cross-References. Authorization to issue citations, rules and regulations, § 62-19-126.

62-19-110. Register of applicants.

The administrative director of the commission shall keep a register of all applicants for license, showing for each the date of application, name, place of business, place of residence and whether the license was granted or refused.

The register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded in the register.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 62-1911; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 7; 1986, ch. 915, § 2; 1990, ch. 1024, § 31; 1990, ch. 1026, § 23; 1995, ch. 60, § 1; 1999, ch. 358, §§ 1, 3.